www/common/latex/texlive/texmf-dist/tex/generic/hyph-utf8/patterns/txt/hyph-eo.pat.txt
konfr2on3t
.mon3t
mastod2on3t
.melol2on3t
.pon3t
.rak2on3t
.rem2on3t
.renk2on3t
.sp2on3t
vol2on3t
duo2pa.
duo2paj.
duo2pajn.
duo2pan.
duo2pe.
duo2po.
duo2poj.
duo2pojn.
duo2pon.
.trio2p
kvar3o2p
kvin3o2p
ses3o2p
sep3o2p
.ok3o2pa.
.ok3o2paj.
.ok3o2pajn.
.ok3o2pan.
.ok3o2pe.
.ok3o2po.
.ok3o2poj.
.ok3o2pojn.
.ok3o2pon.
naŭo4p
dek3o2pa.
dek3o2paj.
dek3o2pajn.
dek3o2pan.
dek3o2pe.
dek3o2po.
dek3o2poj.
dek3o2pojn.
dek3o2pon.
cent3o2pa.
cent3o2paj.
cent3o2pajn.
cent3o2pan.
cent3o2pe.
cent3o2po.
cent3o2poj.
cent3o2pojn.
cent3o2pon.
mil3o2pa.
mil3o2paj.
mil3o2pajn.
mil3o2pan.
mil3o2pe.
mil3o2po.
mil3o2poj.
mil3o2pojn.
mil3o2pon.
1o2ta.
1o2taj.
1o2tajn.
1o2tan.
1o2te.
1o2to.
1o2toj.
1o2tojn.
1o2ton.
abrik2o3t
anekd2o3t
antid2o3t
asimpt2o3t
.az2o3t
.bo3t
.bal2o3t
bankr2o3t
.behem2o3t
bergam2o3t
.bi3g2o3t
.bisk2o3t
bojk2o3t
.do3t
.dep2o3t
.desp2o3t
.dev2o3t
dorl2o3t
.ekz2o3t
.er2o3t
.erg2o3t
.fo3t
.fag2o3t
.fakt2o3t
.fl2o3t
fokstr2o3t
.fr2o3t
.go3t
.gav2o3t
.golg2o3t
.gr2o3t
.herod2o3t
hipn2o3t
hotent2o3t
.jo3t
ĵab2o3t
.ko3t
.kaĉal2o3t
kalik2o3t
.kaml2o3t
.kan2o3t
.kap2o3t
.kar2o3t
.koj2o3t
.komp2o3t
kompl2o3t
kreoz2o3t
.kul2o3t
.kv2o3t
.alikv2o3t
.lo3t
.lit2o3t
.mo3t
.mar2o3t
.mark2o3t
marm2o3t
.mioz2o3t
.no3t
nark2o3t
.po3t
perlam2o3t
.pier2o3t
.pil2o3t
.piv2o3t
.pl2o3t
poligl2o3t
.ro3t
.rab2o3t
reding2o3t
.rob2o3t
.sab2o3t
sacerd2o3t
.sk2o3t
.skler2o3t
.skr2o3t
.sp2o3t
.ŝo3t
ŝevj2o3t
.terak2o3t
.tr2o3t
.trik2o3t
.vo3t
.zel2o3t
.po2r
.pos2t1
pos3t2ament
pos3t2iljon
pos3t2u3l
.prete2r1
.re2f3l2ig
.re2spond
.re2spublik
.re2storaci
.re2tro
.sa2m
sam2ar
.sa3m2u3m
sa3m2uraj
.se2n1
.se3n2aa
.se3n2ao
sen2at
sen2eskal
.si4a
.su2b1
.su3b2ute
.supe2r1
.supe3ra.
.supe3raj.
.supe3rajn.
.supe3ran.
.supe3re.
.supe3ro.
.supe3roj.
.supe3rojn.
.supe3ron.
.supe3ras.
.supe3ri.
.supe3ris.
.supe3ros.
.supe3ru.
.supe3rus.
.ŝi4a
.tran2s
tran3scend
tran3sept
tran3sistor
tran3sit
tran3s2pir
.tu2t1
.tu3ta.
.tu3taj.
.tu3tajn.
.tu3tan.
.tu3te.
.tu3to.
.tu3toj.
.tu3tojn.
.tu3ton.
1u2ja.
1u2jaj.
1u2jajn.
1u2jan.
1u2je.
1u2jo.
1u2joj.
1u2jojn.
1u2jon.
1u2j1ig
1u2j1iĝ
.and2u3j
.halel2u3j
1u2la.
1u2laj.
1u2lajn.
1u2lan.
1u2le.
1u2lo.
1u2loj.
1u2lojn.
1u2lon.
1e2m1u2l
e3m2u3ls
1u2l3ec
1u2l3ej
.akum2u3l
.ang2u3l
.bu3l
.bet2u3l
.bru3l
.ejak2u3l
.fist2u3l
form2u3l
.fu3l
galin2u3l
.gran2u3l
.grat2u3l
.herk2u3l
hierod2u3l
homunk2u3l
.inok2u3l
.ins2u3l
.instanb2u3l
.ju3l
.ĵu3l
.ku3l
.kab2u3l
kalend2u3l
kalk2u3l
kapit2u3l
kaps2u3l
koag2u3l
.kons2u3l
.kop2u3l
korpusk2u3l
.kum2u3l
.lu3l
.liverp2u3l
.mu3l
.mak2u3l
manip2u3l
matrik2u3l
.mod2u3l
molek2u3l
.nu3l
.neb2u3l
.ok2u3l
.pu3l
.paĉ2u3l
partik2u3l
.pust2u3l
.ru3l
.reg2u3l
retik2u3l
.ruk2u3l
.sim2u3l
skrup2u3l
somnamb2u3l
speg2u3l
.spek2u3l
.stim2u3l
.tu3l
.tab2u3l
tarant2u3l
.tru3l
tuberk2u3l
turb2u3l
.ul2u3l
.uv2u3l
.vist2u3l
1u2l1ar
2u3l2ari
2u3l2ard
.pedik2u3l2ar
1u2ma.
1u2maj.
1u2majn.
1u2man.
1u2me.
1u2mo.
1u2moj.
1u2mojn.
1u2mon.
1u2mas.
1u2mi.
1u2mis.
1u2mos.
1u2mu.
1u2mus.
1u2m3ec
.alb2u3m
.bu3m
.opid2u3m
referend2u3m
.fu3m
parf2u3m
.gu3m
.hu3m
.kuk2u3m
.luk2u3m
.lu3m
vol2u3m
.plu3m
.stern2u3m
.pu3m
.ru3m
.ser2u3m
.gru3m
.kvor2u3m
.tru3m
.stru3m
.su3m
.res2u3m
kons2u3m
opos2u3m
.bit2u3m
.kost2u3m
.zu3m
.vi4a
vi5and
vi5atik
.vi2c1
.vi3ca.
.vi3caj.
.vi3cajn.
.vi3can.
.vi3ce.
.vi3co.
.vi3coj.
.vi3cojn.
.vi3con.
.vi3c2ia
.vi3c2io
.vi2r1
vir2us
vi1r2ulent
1a2fabl
1a2gra
1a2kr
1a2per
1a2va1r
4ologi
4ografi
2fik
fre2m2d3l
4b1c
4b1b2
4b1d
4b1f
4b1g
4b1h4
4b1j2
4b1k
4b1m
4b1n
4b1p
4b1s
4b1s2k
4b1t
4b1v
4b1z
4b1ĉ
4b1ĝ
4b1ĵ
4b1ŝ
4c1b
4c1c2
4c1ĉ
4c1d
4c1f
4c1g
4c1ĝ
4c1h4
4c1j2
4c1ĵ
4c1k
4c1l
4c1m
4c1n
4c1p
4c1r
4c1s
4c1ŝ
4c1t
4c1v
4c1z
4ĉ1b
4ĉ1c
4ĉ1d
4ĉ1f
4ĉ1g
4ĉ1h4
4ĉ1j2
4ĉ1k
4ĉ1l
4ĉ1m
4ĉ1n
4ĉ1p
4ĉ1s
4ĉ1t
4ĉ1v
4ĉ1z
4ĉ1ĉ
4ĉ1ĝ
4ĉ1ĵ
4ĉ1ŝ
4d1b
4d1c
4d1d2
4d1f
4d1g
4d1h4
4d1j2
4d1k
4d1l
4d1m
4d1n
4d1p
4d1s
4d1t
4d1v
4d1z
4d1ĉ
4d1ĝ
4d1ĵ
4d1ŝ
1e2ben
1e2d2z
1e2gal
1e2le1g2an3t
4f1b
4f1c
4f1ĉ
4f1d
4f1f2
4f1g
4f1ĝ
4f1h4
4f1j2
4f1ĵ
4f1k
4f1m
4f1n
4f1p
4f1s
4f1ŝ
f1t
4f1v
4f1z
4g1b
4g1c
4g1ĉ
g1d
4g1f
4g1g2
4g1ĝ
4g1h4
4g1j2
4g1ĵ
4g1k
g1m
g1n
4g1p
4g1s
4g1ŝ
4g1t
g1v
4g1z
4ĝ1b
4ĝ1c
4ĝ1d
4ĝ1f
4ĝ1g
4ĝ1h4
4ĝ1j2
4ĝ1k
4ĝ1l
4ĝ1m
4ĝ1n
4ĝ1p
4ĝ1s
4ĝ1t
4ĝ1v
4ĝ1z
4ĝ1ĉ
4ĝ1ĝ
4ĝ1ĵ
4ĝ1ŝ
4h1ĉ
4h1ĝ
4h1ĵ
4h1ŝ
4ĥ1b
4ĥ1c
4ĥ1d
4ĥ1f
4ĥ1g
4ĥ1h4
4ĥ1j2
4ĥ1k
4ĥ1m
4ĥ1n
4ĥ1p
4ĥ1s
4ĥ1t
4ĥ1v
4ĥ1z
4ĥ1ĉ
4ĥ1ĝ
4ĥ1ĵ
4ĥ1ŝ
1i2dent
4j1b
4j1c
4j1d
4j1f
4j1g
4j1h4
4j1k
4j1l
4j1m
4j1n
4j1p
4j1r
4j1s
4j1t
4j1v
4j1z
4j1ĉ
4j1ĝ
4j1ĵ
4j1ŝ
4ĵ1b
4ĵ1c
4ĵ1d
4ĵ1f
4ĵ1g
4ĵ1h4
4ĵ1j2
4ĵ1k
4ĵ1l
4ĵ1m
4ĵ1n
4ĵ1p
4ĵ1s
4ĵ1t
4ĵ1v
4ĵ1z
4ĵ1ĉ
4ĵ1ĝ
4ĵ1ĵ
4ĵ1ŝ
4k1b
4k1c
4k1d
4k1f
4k1g
4k1h4
4k1j2
4k1m
4k1n
4k1p
4k1s
k1s2t2r
4k1t
k1v
4k1z
4k1ĉ
4k1ĝ
4k1ĵ
4k1ŝ
4l1b
4l1c
4l1d
4l1f
4l1g
4l1h4
4l1j2
4l1k
4l1l2
4l1m
4l1n
4l1p
4l1r
4l1s2
4l1t
4l1v
4l1z
4l1ĉ
4l1ĝ
4l1ĵ
4l5ŝ2
4m1b
4m1c
4m1d
4m1f
4m1g
4m1h4
4m1j2
4m1k
4m1l
4m1m2
4m1n
4m1p
4m1r
4m1s
4m1t
4m1v
4m1z
4m1ĉ
4m1ĝ
4m1ĵ
4m1ŝ
mul2t1
mult2e
mul2t3eg
mul3ta
mul3te.
mul3to
mul4t3obl
4n1b
4n1c
4n1d
4n1f
4n1g
4n1h4
4n1j
4n1k
n2kv
4n1l
n1m
4n1n
4n1p
4n1r
4n1s
n1s2c
n1s2t
4n1t
4n1v2
4n1z
4n1ĉ
4n1ĝ
4n1ĵ
4n1ŝ
n2k1c
n2s1f
nor2d1af
nor2d1am
nor2d1az
nor2d1eŭ
nor2d1rus
nor2d1germ
1o2be
1o2kup
1o2por1tun
4p1b
4p1c
4p1d
p1f
4p1g
4p1h4
p1j2
p1k
p1m
p1n
p1s
p1t
4p1v
4p1z
4p1ĉ
4p1ĝ
4p1ĵ
p1ŝ
4r1b
4r1c
4r1d
4r1f
4r1g
4r1h4
4r1j2
4r1k
4r1l
4r1m
4r1n
4r1p
4r1s
4r1t
4r1v
4r1z
4r1ĉ
4r1ĝ
4r1ĵ
4r1ŝ
s1b
s1c
4s1ĉ
4s1d
s1f
s1g
4s1ĝ
4s1h4
4s1j2
4s1ĵ
s1k
4s1l
3s2lab
3s2lalom
3s2lang
3s2lav
3s2led
3s2lip
3s2lojd
3s2lovak
3s2loven
3s2lup
3s2lofoks
4s1m
3s2malt
3s2merald
3s2milak
3s2mirg
3s2mut
4s1n
3s2nob
3s2nuf
s1p
s1r
4s1s
4s1ŝ
s1t
1s2tu1d
s1v
4s1z
.su2d1af
.su2d1am
.su2d1azi
.su2d1eŭr
.su2d1rus
4ŝ1b
4ŝ1c
4ŝ1d
4ŝ1f
4ŝ1g
4ŝ1h4
4ŝ1j2
4ŝ1k
ŝ1m
ŝ1n
ŝ1p
4ŝ1s
ŝ1t
ŝ1v
4ŝ1z
4ŝ1ĉ
4ŝ1ĝ
4ŝ1ĵ
4ŝ1ŝ
1ŝ2tel
4t1b
4t1c
4t1d
4t1f
4t1g
4t1h4
4t1j2
4t1k
4t1m
4t1n
4t1p
4t1s
4t1t
4t1v
4t1z
4t1ĉ
4t1ĝ
4t1ĵ
4t1ŝ
4ŭ1
ŭ2s1k
4v1b
4v1c
4v1d
4v1f
4v1g
4v1h4
4v1j2
4v1k
4v1l
4v1m
4v1n
4v1p
4v1s
4v1t
4v1v
4v1z
4v1ĉ
4v1ĝ
4v1ĵ
4v1ŝ
4z1b
4z1c
4z1d
4z1f
4z1g
4z1h4
4z1j2
4z1k
4z1l
z2lot
4z1m
4z1n
4z1p
4z1r
4z1s
4z1t
4z1v
4z1ĉ
4z1ĝ
4z1ĵ
4z1ŝ
